Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1230
Displacement from business or farm; fixed payment; criteria.

Any displaced person eligible for payments under section 76-1228 who is displaced from the person's place of business or farm operation and who is eligible for payments under this section according to criteria established by the head of the lead agency may elect to accept the payment authorized by this section in lieu of the payment authorized by section 76-1228. Such payment shall consist of a fixed payment in an amount to be determined according to criteria established by the head of the lead agency, except that such payment shall be at least one thousand dollars but not more than twenty thousand dollars. In establishing the criteria authorized by this section, the head of the lead agency shall take into consideration the reasonable expenses associated with the relocation of a business or farm operation and the regulations adopted and promulgated by the United States Department of Transportation under the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, Public Law 91-646, as amended. A person whose sole business at the displacement dwelling is the rental of such property to others shall not qualify for a payment under this section.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 17.